Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201266-2105
Jurisdictional utility; consider
factors.

Prior
to undertaking rural infrastructure development, a jurisdictional utility
shall consider factors such as the economic impact to the area, economic feasibility,
whether other options may be more in the public interest, such as utilization
of any existing or planned interstate or intrastate pipeline facilities of
private persons, companies, firms, or corporations, and the likelihood of
successful completion and ongoing operation of the facility.

Laws 2012, LB1115, § 5.
July 19, 2012